Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1545.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1376(b.1)(4) and 1379 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1376. Surrender of registration plates and cards upon suspension or revocation.* * *(b.1) Immediate seizure of registration plates and cards.--The department may delegate authority to the persons described in this section to immediately seize registration plates and cards upon imposition of the following:* * *(4) a suspension imposed pursuant to section 1379 (relating to suspension of registration upon [sixth] unpaid 12345678910111213141516171819 parking [violation in cities of the first class] violations) until all fines, penalties and costs have been paid; or* * *§ 1379. Suspension of registration upon [sixth] unpaid parking [violation in cities of the first class] violations.(a) Suspension of registration.--The department shall suspend the registration of a vehicle upon the notification from the parking authority or a parking enforcement office that the owner or registrant of the vehicle has failed to respond, failed to pay or defaulted in:(1) the payment of six or more tickets or citations issued for parking violations [in cities of the first class.] by a parking authority or parking enforcement office; or(2) the payment of more than $500 in cumulative fines or civil penalties issued for parking violations by the parking authority or a parking enforcement office.(b) Notice to the department.--No sooner than 30 days after mailing the notice provided under subsection (b.1), the parking authority or parking enforcement office shall notify the department electronically in a format prescribed by the department whenever an owner or registrant fails to respond, fails to pay or defaults in payment of [six or more tickets or citations issued for] parking violations as provided for under subsection (a). When a notice has been provided under this subsection and all of the tickets, civil penalties and citations are subsequently paid, dismissed, reversed on appeal or canceled, the parking authority or parking enforcement office shall notify the department electronically in a format prescribed by the department of the disposition of the tickets or civil penalties and shall provide the owner or registrant 20250HB1545PN2097 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with a release from the suspension.(b.1) [Notice] FINAL NOTICE by the parking authority or parking enforcement office .--Prior to notifying the department under subsection (b), the parking authority or parking enforcement office shall provide the owner or registrant written notice by first class mail of its intent to seek suspension of the vehicle registration pursuant to this section.(B.2) WARNING NOTICE BY THE PARKING AUTHORITY OR PARKING ENFORCEMENT OFFICE.--THE PARKING AUTHORITY OR PARKING ENFORCEMENT OFFICE SHALL PROVIDE THE OWNER OR REGISTRANT WRITTEN NOTICE BY FIRST CLASS MAIL THAT THE OWNER OR REGISTRANT HAS FAILED TO RESPOND, FAILED TO PAY OR DEFAULTED IN THE PAYMENT OF FOUR TICKETS OR CITATIONS ISSUED FOR PARKING VIOLATIONS BY A PARKING AUTHORITY OR PARKING ENFORCEMENT OFFICE. THE WRITTEN NOTICE SHALL INCLUDE THAT THE PARKING AUTHORITY OR PARKING ENFORCEMENT OFFICE WILL SEEK SUSPENSION OF THE VEHICLE REGISTRATION UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE OWNER OR REGISTRANT FAILS TO RESPOND, FAILS TO PAY OR DEFAULTS IN THE PAYMENT OF SIX OR MORE TICKETS OR CITATIONS ISSUED FOR PARKING VIOLATIONS BY A PARKING AUTHORITY OR PARKING ENFORCEMENT OFFICE.(c) Period of suspension.--A suspension under subsection (a) shall continue until the department receives notice from the parking authority or parking enforcement office that all of the tickets, civil penalties and citations are paid, dismissed, reversed on appeal or canceled or the defendant enters into an agreement to make installment payments for the fines and penalties imposed, provided that the suspension may be reimposed by the department if the defendant fails to make regular installment payments and pays the fee prescribed in section 1960 (relating to reinstatement of operating privilege or vehicle 20250HB1545PN2097 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registration).(d) Additional suspension.--The department shall impose an additional period of registration suspension if, subsequent to the issuance of a suspension under subsection (a) but prior to the restoration of the registration, the department is notified by the parking authority or parking enforcement office that the owner or registrant has failed to respond, failed to pay or defaulted in the payment of an additional ticket, civil penalty or citation issued for a parking violation.(e) Three-year limitation.--No suspension may be imposed based upon a parking violation more than three years after the commission of the violation.(e.1) Agreement with department.--A parking enforcement office may not seek a suspension under subsection (a) until the parking enforcement office enters into an agreement with the department to enforce this section. The department shall transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin of the execution of an agreement with a parking enforcement office within 30 days of the execution.(f) [Definition.--As used in this section, the term "parking authority" means a parking authority in a city of the first class known as the Philadelphia Parking Authority.] Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Parking authority." A parking authority in a city of the first class known as the Philadelphia Parking Authority."Parking enforcement office." A parking authority authorized under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 55 (relating to parking authorities) that 20250HB1545PN2097 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is not in a city of the first class or a police department that enforces parking violations and is not in a city of the first class."Police department." The term shall have the same meaning as defined under 53 Pa.C.S. § 2162 (relating to definitions).Section 2. Section 1960 of Title 75, amended October 31, 2024 (P.L.1143, No.138), is amended to read:§ 1960. Reinstatement of operating privilege or vehicle registration.The department shall charge a fee of $70 or, if section 1379 (relating to suspension of registration upon [sixth] unpaid parking [violation in cities of the first class] violations), 1380 (relating to suspension of registration upon unpaid tolls) or 1786(d) (relating to required financial responsibility) applies, a fee of $88 to restore a person's operating privilege or the registration of a vehicle following a suspension or revocation. The department shall waive a fee imposed under this section for a person who enters into a program of community service under section 1533(d) (relating to suspension of operating privilege for failure to respond to citation), makes an agreement for installment payments or is found unable to pay in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 9730 (relating to payment of court costs, restitution and fines).Section 3. The amendment of 75 Pa.C.S. § 1379 shall only apply to cumulative fines or civil penalties issued for parking violations by a parking enforcement office after the effective date of this section.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 24 months.20250HB1545PN2097 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728